Washington statutes.
RCW 21.40.050

Authority to determine award amount—Securities administrator.

The determination of the amount of an award made under this chapter shall be in the discretion of the securities administrator consistent with RCW 21.40.040 and 21.40.060.

[ 2023 c 149 s 6.]